Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3112
Board; membership; qualifications.

The board shall consist of five professional members and two public members appointed pursuant to section 38-158. The members shall meet the requirements of sections 38-164 and 38-165, except that two of the five years of experience for professional members may have been served in teaching or research.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1046.